Louisiana, session 2026, HB212.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:9038.82 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§9038.82. Delmont Economic Development District
A. There is hereby created within the parish of East Baton Rouge, as more
specifically provided in Subsection B of this Section, a body politic and corporate
which shall be known as the Delmont Economic Development District, referred to
in this Section as the "district". The district shall be a political subdivision of the
state as defined in the Constitution of Louisiana.
B. Commencing at the intersection of the westerly right-of-way line of Plank
Road and the northerly right-of-way line of Evangeline Street common with
southeasterly corner of Lot 18-A, Block 16, Delmont Place Subdivision, said corner
being Point of Beginning; thence westerly along the northerly right-of-way line of
Page 1 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-505 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 212
Evangeline Street to the southwesterly corner of Lot 18-A, Block 16, Delmont Place
Subdivision; thence northerly departing the northerly right-of-way line of Evangeline
Street along the westerly property line of said Lot-18-A to the northwesterly corner
of said Lot 18-A common with southwesterly corner of Lot 18-B, Block 16, Delmont
Place Subdivision; thence northerly along the westerly property line of said 18-B to
the southerly right-of-way line of Byron Street common with the northwesterly
corner of said Lot 18-A; thence easterly along the southerly right-of-way line of
Byron Street to a point and corner opposite the southwesterly corner of Lot 26,
Block15, Delmont Place Subdivision; thence northerly to the northerly right-of-way
line of Byron Street common with the southwesterly corner of Lot 26, block 15,
Delmont Place Subdivision; thence departing said right-of-way along the westerly
property line of said Lot 26 to the northwesterly corner of said Lot 26 common with
the southwestern corner of Lot 18, Block 15, Delmont Place Subdivision; thence
easterly along the northerly property line of said Lot 26 to the southwesterly corner
of Lot 22, Block 15; thence northerly along the westerly property lines of Lots 22,
21 and 20, Block 15, to the southerly right-of-way line of Sycamore Street common
with the northwesterly corner of said Lot 20, Block 15; thence northerly to the
northerly right-of-way line of Sycamore Street common with the southwesterly
corner of Lot 26, Block14, Delmont Place Subdivision; thence northerly along the
westerly property line of said Lot 26 to the northwesterly corner of said Lot 26
common with the southwesterly corner of Lot 18, Block 14 and Lot 17, Block 14,
and the northeasterly corner Lot 27, Block 14, Delmont Place Subdivision; thence
westerly along the northerly property lines of Lots 27 through 34, Block 14, Delmont
Place Subdivision to a point and corner being the northwesterly corner of said Lot
34; thence southerly along the westerly property line of said Lot 34 to a point and
corner being the northeasterly corner of Lot 35, Block 14, Delmont Place
Subdivision; thence westerly along the northerly property lines of Lots 35 through
38, Block 14, Delmont Place Subdivision to a point and corner being the
northwesterly corner of said Lot 38 common with the easterly property line of Lot
Page 2 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-505 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 212
39, Block 14, Delmont Place Subdivision; thence northerly along the easterly
property line of said Lot 39 to a point and corner being the northeasterly corner of
said Lot 39; thence westerly along the northerly property lines of Lots 39 through 42,
Block 14, Delmont Place Subdivision to a point and corner being the northwesterly
corner of said Lot 42 common the easterly right-of-way line of Longfellow Drive;
thence northeasterly along the eastern right-of-way line of Longfellow Drive to a
point and corner common with the northerly right-of-way line of Kelvin Street and
the southwesterly corner of Lot 8-A Delmont Place Subdivision, Block 11; thence
easterly along said right-of-way line of Kelvin Street to a point and corner being the
southeasterly corner of Lot 8-A, Block 11, Delmont Place Subdivision; thence
northerly departing said right-of-way along the easterly property line of said Lot 8-A
to a point and corner being the northeasterly of said Lot 8-A being common with the
southerly right-of-way line of Riley Street; thence easterly along the said
right-of-way line of Riley Street to a point and corner being opposite the
southwesterly corner of Lot 7-A, Block 10, Delmont Place Subdivision; thence
departing the southerly right-of-way line of Riley Street northerly to the
southwesterly corner of Lot 7-A, Block 10, Delmont Place Subdivision, common
with the northerly right-of-way line of Riley Street; thence departing said
right-of-way northerly along the westerly property line of Lot 7-A, Delmont Place
Subdivision to a point and corner being the northwesterly corner of said Lot 7-A;
thence easterly along the northerly property line of said Lot 7-A to a point and corner
being the southwesterly corner of Lot 21, Block 10, Delmont Place Subdivision;
thence northerly along the westerly property line of said Lot 21, Block 10 to a point
and corner being the southwesterly corner of Lot 19, Block 17, Hollywood
Subdivision' thence easterly along the southerly property line of said Lot 19, Block
17, Hollywood Subdivision to a point and corner being the southeasterly corner of
said Lot 19, common with the southwesterly corner of Lot 22, Block 17 Hollywood
Subdivision; thence northerly along the westerly property lines of Lots 22, 21 and
20, Block 17, Hollywood Subdivision to a point and corner being the northwesterly
Page 3 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-505 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 212
corner of Lot 20, Block 17, Hollywood Subdivision being common with the
southerly right-of-way line of Hollywood Street; thence departing said right-of-way
of Hollywood Street northerly to a point and corner being the southwesterly corner
of Lot 28, Block 18, Hollywood Subdivision, being common with the northerly
right-of-way line of Hollywood Street; thence northerly along the westerly property
line of Lots 28 and 27, Block 18, Hollywood Subdivision to the southerly property
line of Lot 26, Block 18, Hollywood Subdivision, common with the a northwesterly
corner of said Lot 27; thence westerly along the southerly property line of said Lot
26, to a point and corner being the southwesterly corner of said Lot 26; thence
northerly to the northwesterly corner of said Lot 26, common with the southerly
property line of Village Park Subdivision; thence easterly along the southerly
property line of Village Park Subdivision to the southwesterly corner of Lot 2,
Village Park Subdivision; thence northerly to the southerly right-of-way line of
Amarillo Street common with the northwestern corner of Lot 2, Village Park
Subdivision; thence easterly continuing along the southerly right-of-way line of
Amarillo Street to the northeasterly corner of Lot 2, Village Park Subdivision; thence
northerly to the northerly right-of-way line of Amarillo Street common with
southwesterly corner of Lot 10, Village Park Subdivision; thence northerly along the
westerly property lines of Lots 10 and 13, Village Park Subdivision to the southerly
right-of-way line Vaughn Drive common with the northwesterly corner of Lot 13,
Village Park Subdivision; thence northerly to the northerly right-of-way line of
Vaughn Drive common with the southwesterly corner of Lot 22 Village Park
Subdivision and the southeasterly corner of Lot 21, Village Park Subdivision; thence
continuing westerly along the northerly right-of-way line of Vaughn Drive to the
southwesterly corner of Lot 21; thence northerly along the westerly property line of
Lot 21 to the northwesterly corner of Lot 21, Village Park Subdivision; thence
easterly along the northerly property lines of Lots 21 and 22, Village Park
Subdivision; thence northerly along the easterly property line of Lot 25, Village Park
Subdivision to the southerly right-of-way line of Greenwell Street common with the
Page 4 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-505 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 212
northeasterly corner of Lot 25, Village Park Subdivision; thence northeasterly to the
westerly right-of-way line of Plank Road common with the northerly right-of-way
line of Monte Sano Bayou; thence northeasterly along the westerly right-of-way line
of Plank Road to the southerly right-of-way line of J.H. Cooney Drive; thence
westerly along the southerly right-of-way line of J.H. Cooney Drive to a corner
opposite the southwesterly corner of Tract Y-1-A-2 of the J.H. Cooney Property;
thence northerly along the westerly property line of said Tract Y-1-A-2 to the
northwesterly corner of said Tract Y-1-A-2 common to the southwesterly corner of
Tract Y-1-A-1-B of the J.H. Cooney Property; thence northerly along the westerly
property line of said Tract Y-1-A-1-B to the northwesterly corner of said Tract
Y-1-A-1-B; thence easterly along the northerly property line of said Tract Y-1-A-1-B
to the northeasterly corner of said Tract common with the northwesterly corner of
Tract "X" of the J.H. Cooney Tract; thence easterly along the northerly property line
of said Tract "X" to the westerly right-of-way line of Plank Road common with the
northeasterly corner of Tract "X" of the J.H Cooney Property; thence northerly along
the westerly right-of-way line of Plank Road to the southeasterly corner of an
unnumbered 0.79 acre lot of the Original W.P. Denham Tract common with the
northerly right-of-way line of Cannon Street; thence departing the right-of-way line
of Plank Road westerly along the northerly right-of-way line of Cannon Street to the
southwesterly corner of said 0.79 acre lot; thence departing said right-of-way of
Cannon Street northerly to the northwesterly to the southerly right-of-way line of
Vergie Street common with the northwesterly corner of said 0.79 acre lot; thence
departing said right-of-way northerly to the southerly right-of-way line of Vergie
Street; thence easterly along said right-of-way to the southwesterly corner of Lot 6
of the W.P. Denham Tract; thence departing said right-of-way line of Vergie Street
along the westerly property line of Lots 6 thru 1, common with the southerly
right-of-way line of Harriet Street; thence departing said right-of-way northerly to
the northerly right-of-way line of Harriet Street, common with the southwesterly
corner of Lot 3, Joseph Digirolamo Property; thence departing said right-of-way
Page 5 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-505 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 212
northerly along the westerly property line of Lots 3 thru 1 of the Joseph Digirolamo
Property to the northwesterly corner of Lot 1; thence easterly to the westerly
right-of- line way line of Plank Road common with the northeasterly corner of said
Lot 1; thence departing said right-of-way easterly to the easterly right-of-way line
of Plank Road; thence northeasterly to the northeasterly corner of Tract A-1 of the
Denham Tract common with said right-of-way; thence departing said right-of-way
southerly to the southeasterly corner of said Tract A-1 common with the
northeasterly corner of Tract B-1 of the Denham Tract; thence southerly along the
easterly property line of said Tract B-1 to the northerly right-of-way line of Dawson
Drive, common with the southeasterly corner of said Tract B-1; thence westerly
along the northerly right-of-way line of Dawson Drive to a point and corner opposite
the northeasterly corner of Lot 2-B-2, Denham Place common with the southerly
right-of-way line of Dawson Drive; thence southerly to the southerly right-of-way
line of Dawson Drive common with the northeasterly corner of said Lot 2-B-2;
thence departing said right-of-way line of Dawson Drive southerly along the easterly
property line of Lot 2-B-2 to the southeasterly corner of Lot 2-B-2, Denham Place;
thence easterly along the northerly property line of Lot 4-A being a portion of
Denham Place and Fairview Place to the northeasterly corner of said Lot 4-A; thence
southerly along the easterly property line of said Lot 4-A to the northerly
right-of-way line of Cannon Street common with the southeasterly corner of said Lot
4-A; thence westerly along said right-of-way to a point and corner common to said
right-of-way opposite the northeasterly corner of Lot 3, Langlois Place; thence
departing said right-of-way southerly to the southerly right-of-way line of Cannon
Street common with the northeasterly corner of Lot 3 Langlois Place; thence
departing said right-of-way southerly along the easterly property line of Lots 3 thru
1, Langlois Place to the southeasterly corner of Lot 1, Langlois Place; thence easterly
to the northeasterly corner of Lot 5-A, Denham Tract; thence southerly to the
southeasterly corner of said Lot 5-A; thence westerly to the northeasterly corner of
Lot Y, Denham Tract; thence southerly to the northerly right-of-way line of Denham
Page 6 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-505 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 212
Street, common with the southeasterly corner of said Lot "Y"; thence westerly along
said right-of-way to a point and corner common to said right-of-way opposite the
northeasterly corner of Lot "A" Denham Tract; thence departing the northerly
right-of-way line of Denham Street, southerly to the southerly right-of-way line of
Denham Street, common with the northeasterly corner of Lot "A" Denham Tract;
thence departing said right-of-way southerly along the easterly property line of said
Lot "A" to the southeasterly corner of said Lot "A", common with the northerly
property line of Lot A-3-A-1-A, Plank Road Village; thence easterly along the
northerly property line of Lot A-3-A-1-A to the northeasterly corner of Lot
A-3-A-1-A, Plank Road Village; thence southerly along the easterly property line of
said Lot A-3-A-1-A to the southeasterly corner of said Lot A-3-A-1-A common with
the northeasterly corner of Lot A-3-A-2 Plank Road Park; thence southerly to the
southeasterly corner of said Lot A-3-A-2 common with the northerly right-of-way
line of Lateral of Monte Sano Bayou; thence westerly along the southerly property
line of said Lot A-3-A-2 to a point and corner opposite the northeasterly corner of
Lot 1-A-2, Maurice Place; thence southerly to the northeasterly corner of said Lot
1-A-2 common with the southerly right-of-way line of Lateral of Monte Sano Bayou;
thence westerly along the northerly property line of Lot 1-A-2, Maurice Place to the
northwesterly corner of Lot 1-A-2; thence southerly along the westerly property line
of said Lot 1-A-2 common with the easterly property line of Lot 1-A-1, Maurice
Place to the southeasterly corner of Lot 1-A-1; thence westerly along the southerly
property line of Lot 1-A-1 to the eastern right-of-way line of Plank Road common
with the southwesterly corner of Lot 1-A-1 and the northwesterly corner of Lot
2-A-1, Maurice; thence southerly along the eastern right-of-way line of Plank Road
to the southwesterly corner of Lot 2-A-1 Maurice Place and the northwesterly corner
of Lot 3 Maurice Place common with said right-of-way; thence easterly along the
northerly property line of Lot 3, Maurice Place to the northeasterly corner of said Lot
3; thence; thence southerly along the easterly property line of said Lot 3 to the
southeasterly corner of said Lot 3 common with the northeasterly corner of Lot 4-A,
Page 7 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-505 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 212
Maurice Place; thence southerly along the easterly property line of said Lot 4-A to
the southeasterly corner of said Lot 4-A; thence westerly along the southerly
property line of said Lot 4-A to the northeasterly corner of Lot 9-A-X, Maurice
Place; thence southerly along the easterly property line of said Lot 9-A-X to the
northerly right-of-way line of Hollywood Street common with the southeasterly
corner of said Lot 9-A-X; thence westerly along the northerly right-of-way line of
Hollywood Street to a point and corner opposite the northeasterly corner of Lot 8-A,
Block 1, St. Gerard Place; thence departing said right-of-way southerly to the
southerly right-of-way line of Hollywood Street common with the northeasterly
corner of Lot 8-A, Block 1, St. Gerard Place; thence departing said right-of-way line
southerly along the east property line of said Lot 8-A, Block 1, to the southeasterly
corner of said Lot 8-A,Block 1; thence westerly to the northwesterly corner of
Lot 18, Block 1, St. Gerard Place; thence southerly along the westerly property line
of said Lot 18 to the northerly right-of-way line of St. Katherine Ave., common to
the southeasterly of said Lot 18, Block 1; thence departing said right-of-way
southerly to the southerly right-of-way line of St. Katherine Ave. opposite the
southerly corner of Lot 18, Block 1, St. Gerard Place; thence westerly along said
right-of-way line to the intersection of the southerly right-of-way line of
St. Katherine Ave. with the easterly right-of-way line of Plank Road; thence
southerly along the easternly right-of-way line of Plank Road to the intersection of
easterly right-of-line of Plank Road and the southerly right-of-way line of St. Gerard
Ave. thence easterly along the southerly right-of-way line of St. Gerard Ave. to the
northeasterly corner of Lot 1, Block 8, St. Gerard Place; thence southerly along the
easterly property line of Lots 1, 2, 3, Block 8, St. Gerard Place, projected to a point
and corner on the northerly property line of Lot 3, Block 1, Schorten Place; thence
westerly along said Lot 3, Block 1 to the northeasterly corner of Lot 1, Block 1,
Schorten Place; thence southerly along the easterly property line of Lot 1 and Lot 2,
Block 1, Schorten Place to the northerly right-of-way line of Lorraine Street common
with the southeasterly corner of said Lot 2, Block 1, Schorten Place; thence southerly
Page 8 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-505 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 212
to the southerly right of way of Lorraine Street common with Lot 3, Block 2,
Schorten Place, thence departing said right-of-way along the easterly property line
of said Lot 3 to the southeasterly corner of said Lot 3 common with the
northwesterly corner of Lot 11, Block 2, Schorten Place; thence easterly along the
northerly property line of said Lot 11 to the northeasterly corner of said Lot 11;
thence southerly along the easterly property line of said Lot 11 to the northerly
right-of-way line of Beech Street common with the southeasterly corner of Lot 11,
Block 2, Schorten Place; thence westerly along said right-of-way line to a point and
corner opposite the northeasterly corner of Lot 1, Block 3, Schorten Place; thence
departing said right-of-way line southerly to the southerly right-of-way line Beech
Street common to the northeasterly corner of Lot 1, Block 3, Schorten Place; thence
departing said right-of-way line southerly along the easterly property line of said
Lots 1, 2, 17 and 18, Block 3, Schorten Place to the northerly right-of-way line of
Sycamore Street common with the southeasterly corner of Lot 18, Block 3, Schorten
Place; thence departing said right-of-way line to the southerly right-of-way line of
Sycamore Street common with the northeasterly corner of Lot 3, Block 4, Schorten
Place; thence easterly along said right-of-way line to the northeasterly corner of Lot
1, Block 4, Schorten Place; thence southerly departing said right-of-way along the
easterly property lines of Lots 1 and 2, Block 4, Schorten Place and Lot 3, Block
"C", North Highlands Estates, to the northerly right-of-way line of Byron Street
common with the south easterly corner of said Lot 3, Block "3"; thence southerly
departing said right-of-way line to a corner on the southerly right-of-way line of
Byron Street; thence westerly along said right-of-way to the northeasterly corner of
Lot 21, Block "D" North Highlands Estates; thence southerly departing said
right-of-way line along the easterly property lines of Lots 21 and 27, Block "D",
North Highlands Estates to the northerly right-of-way line of Evangeline Street
common with the southeasterly corner of Lot 27, Block "D", North Highlands
Estates; thence westerly along said right-of-way line to a corner opposite the
northeasterly corner of Lot 48, Block "E", North Highlands Estates; thence southerly
Page 9 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-505 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 212
departing said right-of-way line to the southerly right-of-way line of Evangeline
Street common with the northeasterly corner of said Lot 48, Block "E"; thence
southerly departing said right-of-way along the easterly property lines of Lot 48 and
47 Block "E", North Highlands Estates to the southeasterly corner of said Lot 47;
thence westerly along the southerly property line said Lot 47 to the easterly
right-of-way line of Plank Road common with the southwesterly corner of said Lot
47; thence northerly along the easterly right-of-way line of Plank Road to a point and
corner common to the easterly right-of-way line of Plank Road and the northerly
right-of-way line of Evangeline Street; thence westerly departing said point and
corner to a point and corner being common with the westerly right-of-way line of
Plank Road and the northerly right-of-way line of Evangeline Street and the
southeasterly corner of Lot 18-A, Block 16, Delmont Place said point and corner
being the point of beginning.
C.(1) The purpose .of the district is to provide funding for the following:
(a) The acquisition of land, design, development, improvement, renovation,
restoration, revitalization, enhancement, expansion, reconstruction, and construction
of various multi-phased projects related to the economic improvement of the district.
(b) The development and implementation of public-private partnerships and
other initiatives.
(2) The projects to be pursued by the district are designed to encourage
economic development, enhance quality of life, sales and use tax, and hotel
occupancy tax base collections, stimulate job creation by enhancing the feasibility
of private sector projects that help to achieve the economic goals of the city of Baton
Rouge/parish of East Baton Rouge, and catalyze development within the city of
Baton Rouge/parish of East Baton Rouge where it might or might not otherwise be
economically feasible.
D.(1) The district shall be governed by a seven-member board of
commissioners, referred to in this Section as the "board", composed as follows:
Page 10 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-505 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 212
(a) The member of the governing authority of the city of Baton Rouge/parish
of East Baton Rouge who represents District No. 5 shall appoint two members.
(b) The member of the governing authority of the city of Baton Rouge/parish
of East Baton Rouge who represents District No. 10 shall appoint one member.
(c) The mayor-president of the city of Baton Rouge/parish of East Baton
Rouge shall appoint one member.
(d) The member of the Louisiana House of Representatives whose district
encompasses all or the greater portion of the area of the district shall appoint one
member.
(e) The member of the Louisiana Senate whose district encompasses all or
the greater portion of the area of the district shall appoint one member.
(f) The governing board of the Greater Baton Rouge Economic Partnership
shall appoint one member.
(2) Board members shall serve four-year terms after serving initial terms as
provided in this Paragraph. Two members shall serve an initial term of one-year;
two shall serve two years; two shall serve three years; and one shall serve four years
as determined by lot at the first meeting of the board.
(3) Any vacancy which occurs prior to the expiration of the terms for which
a member of the board has been appointed shall be filled for the remainder of the
unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment. Board members
shall be eligible for reappointment.
(4) The board shall elect from its members a chairman, a vice chairman, a
secretary-treasurer, and such other officers as it may deem necessary. The duties of
the officers shall be fixed by the bylaws adopted by the board.
(5) The minute books and archives of the district shall be maintained by the
secretary-treasurer of the board. The monies, funds, and accounts of the district shall
be in the official custody of the board.
(6) The board shall adopt such rules and regulations as it deems necessary
or advisable for conducting its business affairs. Rules and regulations of the board
Page 11 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-505 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 212
relative to the notice and conduct of meetings shall conform to applicable law,
including, if applicable, R.S. 42:11 et seq., relative to open meetings. The board
shall hold regular meetings as shall be provided for in the bylaws and may hold
special meetings at such times and places within the district as may be prescribed in
the bylaws.
(7) A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business. The board shall keep minutes of all meetings and shall make
them available through the secretary-treasurer of the board.
(8) The members of the board shall serve without compensation but shall be
reimbursed for their reasonable out-of-pocket expenses directly related to the
governance of the district.
E. The district, acting by and through its board, may exercise all powers of
a political subdivision and special taxing district necessary or convenient for the
carrying out of its objects and purposes including but not limited to the following:
(1) To sue and to be sued.
(2) To adopt bylaws and rules and regulations.
(3) To receive by gift, grant, donation, or otherwise any sum of money,
property, or aid or assistance from the United States, the state of Louisiana, or any
political subdivision thereof, or any person, firm, or corporation.
(4) For the public purposes of the district to enter into contracts, agreements,
or cooperative endeavors with the state and its political subdivisions or political
corporations and with any public or private association, corporation, business entity,
or individual.
(5) To appoint officers, agents, and employees, prescribe their duties, and fix
their compensation.
(6) To acquire by gift, grant, purchase, or lease such property as may be
necessary or desirable for carrying out the objectives and purposes of the district and
to mortgage and sell such property.
Page 12 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-505 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 212
(7) In its own name and on its own behalf to incur debt and to issue bonds,
notes, certificates and other evidences of indebtedness.
(8) To establish such funds or accounts as are necessary for the conduct of
the affairs of the district.
F.(1)(a) The district may levy and collect a sales and use tax not to exceed
one percent within the territorial jurisdiction of the district.
(b) The sales and use tax so levied shall be imposed by an resolution of the
board and shall be levied upon the sale at retail, the use, lease, or rental, the
consumption and the storage for consumption of, and distribution of tangible
personal property or digital products, and on sales or services in the district, all as
defined in Chapter 2 of Subtitle II of Title 47 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950.
(c) The tax shall be in addition to all other taxes and shall be collected at the
same time and in the same manner as set forth in Chapter 2-D of Subtitle II of Title
47 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
(d) The tax shall expire twenty years after its initial levy; however, if there
are outstanding bonds, notes, and other evidences of indebtedness, the tax shall
continue to be levied until the bonds, notes, and other evidences of indebtedness are
paid in full as to both principal and interest.
(2)(a) In addition to the tax authorized in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection
and any other tax levied and collected, the district may levy and collect a tax upon
the paid occupancy of hotel rooms located within the district. The hotel occupancy
tax shall not exceed one percent of the rent or fee charged for such occupancy.
(b) The word "hotel" as used in this Section shall have the same definition
as that contained in R.S. 47:301(6).
(c) The person who exercises or is entitled to occupancy of the hotel room
shall pay the hotel occupancy tax at the time the rent or fee for occupancy is paid.
"Person" as used in this Paragraph shall have the same definition as that contained
in R.S. 47:301(8).
Page 13 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-505 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 212
(d) The hotel occupancy tax shall be in addition to all taxes levied upon the
occupancy of hotel rooms located within the city.
(e) The tax shall expire twenty years after its initial levy; however, if there
are outstanding bonds, notes, and other evidences of indebtedness, the tax shall
continue to be levied until the bonds, notes, and other evidences of indebtedness are
paid in full as to both principal and interest.
(3) The district may enter into a contract with any public entity authorized
to collect sales or use taxes, under terms and conditions it considers appropriate,
including payment of a reasonable collection fee for the collection of the sales and
use tax and hotel occupancy tax authorized in this Subsection.
G. In order to fund development within the district, the district shall have tax
increment finance authority and other authority that is provided to local
governmental subdivisions in Part II of this Chapter, including but not limited to the
following: ad valorem tax increment financing and bonding in R.S. 33:9038.33;
sales tax increment financing and bonding in R.S. 33:9038.34; and cooperative
endeavor authority in R.S. 33:9038.35. The authority of the district to levy a sales
and use tax and a hotel occupancy tax shall be subject to the rate limitations provided
in this Section.